New York, session 2025-2026, S9400.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 305 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 608 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (c) The commissioner may establish maximum fees to be charged by an 5 official inspection station, provided however that any such maximum fees 6 established by the commissioner shall be uniformly applicable statewide. 7 Such fees shall be prominently displayed at such station. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 9 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13777-01-5